District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

24-305

Office and supplies for probation officers; expenses.

Repealed.

History

June 25, 1910, 36 Stat. 865, ch. 433, § 5
Mar. 4, 1919, 40 Stat. 1325, ch. 122
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2425, Pub. L. 105-274,§ 6(c)(2)(B)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-105.
1973 Ed., § 24-105.

Effective Dates

Pub. L. 105-274, § 10, Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2429, provided:
“Effective Date. Except as otherwise specifically provided, this Act and the amendments made by this Act shall take effect as if included in the enactment of title XI of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997.”